Washington statutes.
RCW 39.102.210

Program evaluation. (Expires June 30, 2044.)

The department of revenue and the community economic revitalization board shall evaluate and periodically report on the implementation of the local infrastructure financing [tool] program to the governor and legislature as the department and the board deems appropriate and recommend such amendments, changes in, and modifications of chapter 181, Laws of 2006 as seem proper.

[ 2006 c 181 s 701.]